Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-10,110.03
Commercial air filters; pilot program; legislative intent; report; rules and regulations.

(1) The State Department of Education shall develop and implement a pilot program to study the efficacy of commercial air filters in classrooms to remove common pollutants and particulate matter and their impact on academic and behavioral performance.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a) The pilot program development and implementation be completed in consultation with the University of Nebraska;

(b) The study be three years in duration over school years 2021-22, 2022-23, and 2023-24;

(c) The pilot program include fifty participating schools with six participating classrooms in each participating school;

(d) Participating schools voluntarily agree to participate in the pilot program;

(e) Participating classrooms be used to educate students in any grade between, and including, grades 3 through 8;

(f) No more than fifty percent of participating schools be selected from the same school district; and

(g) Fifty percent of the participating classrooms be randomly assigned to the control group.

(3) Upon conclusion of the pilot program, the department shall electronically report the results to the Clerk of the Legislature and to the Education Committee of the Legislature.

(4) The State Board of Education may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this section.

Laws 2021, LB630, § 1;

Laws 2022, LB754, § 1.